Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB316.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 65.870 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding KRS 237.104, a city, county, urban-county government, charter
county, consolidated local government, or unified local government may enact
ordinances regulating the manufacture, sale, purchase, taxation, transfer, ownership,
possession, carrying, storage, or transportation of firearms, ammunition, components
of firearms, components of ammunition, firearms accessories, or combination thereof.
Section 2. KRS 65.1591 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Peer support communication" means any oral or written communication
made in the course of, or application for, a peer support counseling session or
any communication by a peer support participant regarding the contents of a
peer support counseling session to another peer support specialist, staff
member of a peer support counseling program, or the supervisor of a peer
support specialist;
(b) "Peer support counseling program" means a program provided by a public
agency to provide counseling services from a peer support specialist to a
public safety employee;
(c) "Peer support counseling session" means any counseling formally provided
through a peer support counseling program between a peer support specialist
and one (1) or more public safety employees;
(d) "Peer support participant" means a public safety employee who receives
counseling services from a peer support specialist;
(e) "Peer support specialist" means a public safety employee designated by the
public agency to provide peer support counseling who has received training in
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1723
both peer support counseling and in providing emotional and moral support to
public safety employees who have been in or exposed to an emotionally
traumatic experience in the course of employment;
(f) "Public agency" has the same meaning as the entities listed in KRS
61.870[65.870(1)]; and
(g) "Public safety employee" means an individual employed by a public agency
who:
1. Serves as a police officer as defined by KRS 15.420(2)(a)1.;
2. Serves in a position that is primarily engaged in firefighting activities,
whether paid or unpaid;
3. Serves as a certified telecommunicator as provided by KRS 15.560 to
15.565; or
4. Is licensed to provide emergency medical services as provided by KRS
Chapter 311A.
(2) Any public agency may create and design a peer support counseling program to
provide support to public safety employees who have been in or exposed to an
emotionally traumatic experience in the course of employment.
(3) The content of any peer support communication shall remain confidential and shall
not be disclosed to any individual who was not party to the peer support counseling
session or peer support communication, except when the peer support
communication contains:
(a) An explicit threat of suicide by a participant in which the participant shares an
intent to die by suicide, a plan to carry out a suicide attempt, or discloses the
means by which the participant intends to carry out a suicide attempt. This
paragraph shall not apply to any peer support communication where the
participant solely shares that the participant is experiencing suicidal thoughts;
(b) An explicit threat by a participant of imminent and serious physical and
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1723
bodily harm or death to a clearly identified or reasonably identifiable victim;
(c) Information related to the abuse or neglect of a child or an older adult or
vulnerable individual that is required by law to be reported;
(d) An admission of criminal conduct; or
(e) Information which is required by law to be disclosed.
(4) A peer support participant shall hold a privilege from disclosure of any peer support
communication in any disciplinary proceeding or any civil or criminal proceeding
unless it contains information exempted under subsection (3)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of
this section. Under this privilege, the peer support communication shall be subject
to the same protections as any counselor-client privilege provided under the
Kentucky Rules of Evidence in any criminal or civil proceeding.
(5) [Nothing in subsection (3) or (4) of ]This section shall not[be interpreted or
construed to] prohibit:
(a) The use of or sharing by the public agency of anonymous data for research,
statistical analysis, or educational purposes;
(b) The disclosure of an observation by an employee of the public agency of a
peer support participant outside of a peer support counseling session and not
contained in peer support communication; or
(c) The disclosure of knowledge of a law enforcement officer of the public
agency about a peer support participant not gained from peer support
communication.
Section 3. KRS 237.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, the provisions of[nothing contained in] KRS
237.109 and[or] 237.110 shall not be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit in any
manner the right of a college, university, or any postsecondary education facility,
including technical schools and community colleges, to control the possession of
deadly weapons on any property owned or controlled by them or the right of a unit
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1723
of state, city, county, urban-county, or charter county government to prohibit the
carrying of concealed deadly weapons in that portion of a building actually owned,
leased, or occupied by that unit of government.
(2) (a) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, the legislative body of a state, city,
county, or urban-county government may, by statute, administrative
regulation, or ordinance, prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed deadly
weapons in that portion of a building owned, leased, or controlled by that unit
of government. That portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed
deadly weapons is prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs
posted at the entrance to the restricted area.
(b) The statute or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public housing by
private persons, highway rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings
owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from any restriction
on the carrying or possession of deadly weapons. The statute, administrative
regulation, or ordinance shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation
but may specify that persons violating the statute or ordinance may be denied
entrance to the building, ordered to leave the building, and if employees of the
unit of government, be subject to employee disciplinary measures for
violation of the provisions of the statute or ordinance.[ The provisions of this
section shall not be deemed to be a violation of KRS 65.870 if the
requirements of this section are followed.]
(c) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to any other unit of
government.
(3) Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or
applicable federal law, no criminal penalty shall attach to carrying a concealed
firearm or other deadly weapon at any location at which an unconcealed firearm or
other deadly weapon may be constitutionally carried.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed